Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2132.01
Certified professional counselor; eligibility for licensure under compact.

The only persons credentialed pursuant to the Mental Health Practice Act that are eligible to be licensed professional counselors under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact are licensed independent mental health practitioners with a certification in professional counseling.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 16.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.